test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_23_hoppee_oahpa-gt-norm-dial_Var.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hopia - ok : # Noun 'borg' -
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Nom: hopia
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Gen: hopian
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Par: hopiaa
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Tra: hopiaksi
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Abe: hopiatta
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ine: hopiassa
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ela: hopiasta
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ill: hopihaan
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ade: hopiala
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Abl: hopialta
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+All: hopiale
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ess: hopiana
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Nom: hopiat
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Gen: hopeitten
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Par: hopeita
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Tra: hopeiksi
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Abe: hopeitta
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ine: hopeissa
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ela: hopeista
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ill: hopeissiin
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ade: hopeila
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Abl: hopeilta
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+All: hopeile
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ess: hopeina
     hoppee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Com: hopeine
